Idaho, session 2025, S1131.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Insurance the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. INSURANCE REGULATION:
FROM:
Insurance Administrative
Fund $317,100 $6,000 $323,100
II. STATE FIRE MARSHAL:
FROM:
Arson, Fire and Fraud Prevention
Fund $48,100 $162,200 $210,300
GRAND TOTAL $365,200 $6,000 $162,200 $533,400
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Department of Insurance is hereby increased by two (2.00) for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.